Nevada, session 83, SB179.
DO ENACT AS FOLLOWS:
Section 1. Chapter 233 of NRS is hereby amended by adding
thereto a new section to read as follows:
1. When conducting an investigation into an alleged
unlawful discriminatory practice in housing, employment or
public accommodations, the Commission shall, for the purpose of
determining whether the alleged unlawful discriminatory practice
was based on the religious creed of a person or group, consider
whether the alleged unlawful discriminatory practice was
motivated by antisemitism.
2. As used in this section, “antisemitism” has the meaning
ascribed to the working definition of antisemitism adopted by the
International Holocaust Remembrance Alliance on May 26, 2016,
and includes, without limitation, the contemporary examples of
antisemitism published by the Alliance as guidance in connection
with that definition on that date.
20 ~~~~~ 25
-
83rd Session (2025)